zh-TW: 是否隨附控制臂襯套: 否; 是 - 內含 (未安裝); 是 - 預先安裝; 其他
cs: Pouzdra ramen jsou součástí dodávky: Ne; Ano – součástí balení (nenainstalováno); Ano – předinstalováno; Jiné
it: Boccole del braccio di controllo incluse: No; Sì - incluse (non installate); Sì - preinstallate; Altro
ko: 컨트롤 암 부싱 포함 여부: 아니요; 예 - 포함됨(미설치); 예 - 사전 설치됨; 기타
pt-PT: Casquilhos do braço de controlo incluídos: Não; Sim, incluídos (não instalados); Sim, pré-instalados; Outros
fr: Bagues de bras de suspension incluses: Non; Oui - inclus (non installés); Oui - pré-installés; Autre
pl: Tuleje wahacza w zestawie: Nie; Tak – dołączone (niezainstalowane); Tak – wstępnie zainstalowane; Inne
ja: コントロールアームブッシュ付き: いいえ; はい - 付属 (未装着); はい - 装着済み; その他
nl: Regelarmbussen meegeleverd: Nee; Ja - inbegrepen (niet geïnstalleerd); Ja - vooraf geïnstalleerd; Overig
es: Bujes del brazo de control incluidos: No; Sí - incluidos (no instalados); Sí - preinstalados; Otro
fi: Mukana tulevat tukivarren puslat: Ei; Kyllä – sisältyy (ei asennettu); Kyllä – valmiiksi asennettu; Muu
pt-BR: Buchas do braço de controle incluídas: Não; Sim, incluídas (não instaladas); Sim, pré-instaladas; Outro
ro-RO: Bucșe braț de control incluse: Nu; Da - incluse (neinstalate); Da - preinstalate; Altele
lt-LT: Įtrauktos valdymo svirties įvorės: Ne; Taip – pridedamos (nesumontuotos); Taip – iš anksto sumontuotos; Kita
vi: Bạc lót cần điều khiển đi kèm: Không; Có - bao gồm (chưa lắp đặt); Có - lắp đặt sẵn; Khác
da: Bøsninger til styrearm, der medfølger: Nej; Ja – medfølger (ikke monteret); Ja – formonteret; Andet
hu: Lengőkarperselyek mellékelve: Nem; Igen – mellékelve (nincs beszerelve); Igen – előszerelt; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vključene puše krmilnih ročic: Ne; Da – priloženo (ni nameščeno); Da – predhodno nameščeno; Drugo
bg-BG: Включени втулки за носач: Не; Да – включени (немонтирани); Да – предварително монтирани; Друго
de: Inklusive Querlenkerbuchsen: Nein; Ja – im Lieferumfang enthalten (nicht montiert); Ja – vormontiert; Sonstige
zh-CN: 含控制臂衬套: 否; 是 - 包含（未安装）; 是 - 预安装; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται δακτύλιοι βραχίονα ελέγχου: Όχι; Ναι - περιλαμβάνονται (όχι εγκατεστημένα); Ναι - προεγκατεστημένα; Άλλο
en: Control arm bushings included: No; Yes - included (not installed); Yes - pre-installed; Other
nb: Kontrollarmforinger inkludert: Nei; Ja – inkludert (ikke installert); Ja – forhåndsinstallert; Annet
ru: Втулки рычага подвески в комплекте: Нет; Да — в комплекте (не установлены); Да — предустановлены; Другое
th: รวมบูชปีกนก: ไม่; ใช่ - รวมอยู่ด้วย (ไม่ได้ติดตั้ง); ใช่ - ติดตั้งมาให้แล้ว; อื่นๆ
tr: Dâhil salıncak kolu burçları: Hayır; Evet - dahil (kurulu değil); Evet - önceden kurulu; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključene čahure upravljačkog ramena: Ne; Da – uključeno (nije instalirano); Da – unaprijed instalirano; Ostalo
sv: Styrarmsbussningar som ingår: Nej; Ja – ingår (ej installerad); Ja – förinstallerad; Annat
sk-SK: Puzdrá ovládacích ramien sú súčasťou balenia: Nie; Áno – súčasťou balenia (nenainštalované); Áno – predinštalované; Iné